Utah statutes.
36-23-106.   Duties -- Reporting.

(1)  The committee shall:

(a)  conduct a sunrise review in accordance with Section 36-23-107 for all applications submitted in accordance with Section 36-23-105;

(b)  conduct a sunset review for an occupational or professional license classification that is referred to the committee by any other legislative committee by applying:

(i)  the criteria in Section 36-23-107;

(ii)  the criteria in Title 63I, Chapter 1, Legislative Oversight and Sunset Act; and

(iii)  any other appropriate criteria; and

(c)  submit a written report by no later than December 31 of each calendar year to:

(i)  the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(ii)  the president of the Senate;

(iii)  the chair of the House Rules Committee;

(iv)  the chair of the Senate Rules Committee; and

(v)  the chairs of the Business, Economic Development, and Labor Appropriations Subcommittee.

(2)  The written report required by Subsection (1)(c) shall include:

(a)  all findings and recommendations made by the committee under Subsection (1) or (3) in that calendar year; and

(b)  a summary report for each sunrise review conducted by the committee stating:

(i)  whether the sunrise review was conducted under Subsection (1) or (3);

(ii)  whether or not the sunrise review included a review of specific proposed statutory language;

(iii)  any action taken by the committee as a result of the sunrise review; and

(iv)  the number of legislative members that voted in favor of the action described in Subsection (2)(b)(iii).

(3)  The committee may:

(a)  conduct a sunrise review of any proposal to newly regulate an occupation or profession;

(b)  conduct any other review referred to it by the Legislature, the Legislative Management Committee, or other legislative committee; or

(c)  conduct any other study related to regulation of an occupation or profession under Title 58, Occupations and Professions.



Amended by Chapter 242, 2012 General Session

